data/grammar/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VvSuffixes

! "gi"/4vv ("added to 'gi' verbs to use them transitively"): the
! unconditioned hand-wiring this comment used to describe (2 gold
! words, "kamagijalik"/"ilitarijauningit") is GONE -- both words' own
! roots ("kama"/"ilitaq") are among the 54 roots whose CSV transSuffix
! column lists "gi/4vv", so the bulk generator's own AfterTransGi4vvRoot
! trigger (generate_affixes.py's TRANSINFIX_LEXICON) already covers
! them precisely, without granting gi/4vv to every other verb stem too
! -- confirmed via snapshot_correct.py before removing this duplicate.

! "i"/1vv: the unconditioned hand-wiring this comment used to describe
! ("iqqaqtuivilirijikkut"/"iqqaqtuivilirijikkunnut", needing i/1vv
! immediately after tuq/1vv) is GONE -- generate_affixes.py now grants
! SUFFIXES (not just roots) an antipassive-category continuation from
! their own CSV "antipassive" column, and tuq/1vv's own column lists
! "i/1vv" -- so it already routes into AfterApIRoot on its own,
! without granting i/1vv to every other verb stem too -- confirmed via
! snapshot_correct.py before removing this duplicate.

! "si"/3vv: the unconditioned hand-wiring this comment used to describe
! ("ilitaqsiniq") is GONE -- root "ilitaq" is among the roots whose CSV
! intransSuffix column lists "si/3vv", so generate_affixes.py's own
! AfterIntransSi3vvRoot trigger already covers it precisely, without
! granting si/3vv to every other verb stem too -- confirmed via
! snapshot_correct.py before removing this duplicate.

! gusuk/1vv's own unconditioned hand-wiring that used to sit here
! ("alianaigusukpunga") is GONE -- root "alianait" was the mystery
! left open in an earlier round (not found in RootsSpalding.csv under
! that spelling) -- it actually lives in CommonCompositeWords.csv
! (row: type=v, intransSuffix="gusuk/1vv", transSuffix="gi/4vv"),
! which generate_roots.py's main() already loads through the SAME
! shared load_roots_csv() as every other root source file, so once
! the intransSuffix/transSuffix columns were threaded through (an
! earlier round, for the RootsSpalding.csv cases), this root started
! being covered automatically too -- confirmed via
! roots-generated.lexc already listing
! "alianait+1v:alianait AfterIntransGusukRoot ;" before removing this
! duplicate, and via snapshot_correct.py after.

! "ksaq"/2vv ("to find, consider s.t. or s.o. ..."): the plain "ksaq"
! and "SUPPRksaq" hand-written duplicates this comment used to describe
! are GONE -- root "naamak" (needed for "naammasaqtuit"/
! "naammasaqtut") has nature="a" in the CSV, so generate_affixes.py's
! own AfterNatureARoot trigger already covers both, without granting
! ksaq/2vv to every other verb stem too -- confirmed via
! snapshot_correct.py before removing them. "SUPPRsaq" (below) is
! NOT a duplicate -- it's a genuinely separate candidate (SUPPR plus
! the suffix's own leading "k" also dropped) the bulk generator
! doesn't produce, so it stays hand-wired, still broadly reachable
! (a smaller, safer leftover than the two removed above).
++ksaq+2vv:SUPPRsaq VerbContinuations ;

! "nngit"/1vv's own CSV row (Suffixes.csv) has Suppression, not Neutral,
! in the t/k/q contexts -- "nngit" was only ever tested after
! vowel-final "angi" ("anginngittut"), where SUPPR is a no-op either way,
! so the gap stayed invisible until a q-final stem ("qaq") needed to
! attach directly; fixed by adding the SUPPR marker. Its VnSuffixes
! continuation had a similar back-and-forth: removed once when its only
! justifying word ("akiqangittuq"/qaq) turned out blocked by an unrelated
! gap (see "qaq"/1nv's investigation note in generate_affixes.py), then restored once
! "ajjigiinngittunik" legitimately needed it (nngit -> juq/1vn).
++nngit+1vv:SUPPRnngit AfterNngitTriggerSuffix ;

! "si"/1vv: revisiting an earlier "ABANDONED" verdict written when mut's
! id-conditional q-context was still the blocker. Suffixes.csv's 3
! candidate rows (nb 1/2/3) all show plain "si" in every context, but
! gold's "aulattijiit"/"pivalliatittinirmut" (t-final preceding morpheme)
! show si surfacing as "ti" -- an s->t change no CSV row documents (a
! direction of assimilation opposite this project's existing t->n/k->t/
! p->t family: here the SUFFIX's own initial consonant matches the
! PRECEDING one, not the reverse). Not guessed as a general rule -- wired
! as its own literal spelling, same "different strings, no collision"
! trick as every other multi-candidate suffix in this file.
! si/1vv's own PLAIN "si" hand-wiring (that used to sit here, motivated
! by "tigusinirmut", root "tigu") is GONE -- "tigu" (and "arjaq", for
! "ajjaqsijii"/"ajjaqsiji") are both among the roots whose CSV
! antipassive column lists "si/1vv", so generate_roots.py's own
! AfterApSiRoot trigger already covers them -- confirmed via
! snapshot_correct.py before removing it. "ti" (below) is NOT a
! duplicate -- it's si/1vv's own separate t-final literal spelling
! (needed by "aulattijiit"/"aulattinirmut"/"pivalliatittinirmut", none
! of which the bulk generator produces), so it stays hand-wired, still
! broadly reachable.
++si+1vv:ti VerbContinuations ;

! "naq"/1vv ("to cause/make"): Suffixes.csv's V-form gives 4 candidates
! (naq/naq/nak/nak, two with an Insertion action) but gold's actual
! "niqsunaqtuq"/"niqtunaqtuq"/"nirtunartuq" cluster shows just TWO real
! literal spellings needed: bare "naq" and its own q->r conversion "nar"
! -- both attested for the SAME root ("niqtuq" family) across different
! Hansard transcriptions, same free-variation shape as usiq/1vn and
! miik/1vn above. Wired as two plain literals (not a NASAL marker
! rewriting something else -- "nar" is naq's OWN alternate spelling, not
! a rewrite of what precedes it).
++naq+1vv:nar VerbContinuations ;

! "qujannami" needs a THIRD spelling, "nna" -- matches Suffixes.csv's
! own V-form row directly: 4 space-separated candidates ("naq naq nak
! nak"), the 2nd/4th pairing "i(n)" (Insertion of "n") with their own
! trailing q/k dropped, confirmed via the real Java analyzer's own
! output before wiring. "tukisinaliqtissimajuq" needs a related but
! DIFFERENT "na" spelling (n NOT doubled, own q also gone) -- still not
! attempted, a separate word to verify on its own.
++naq+1vv:nna VerbContinuations ;

! "tukisinaliqtissimajuq" needs the related but DIFFERENT "na" spelling
! (n NOT doubled, own q also gone) flagged above, confirmed via the
! real Java analyzer's own output before wiring.

! "tit"/1vv ("to cause s.o. to do s.t."): Suffixes.csv's V/k/q-form is a
! single clean candidate (Neutral, bare "tit"), confirmed correct before
! "si"/1vv ("pivalliatittinirmut" keeps the full "tit"). But specifically
! before "jaq"/1vn ("pigiaqtitaq" family), gold shows the reduced span
! "ti" -- "tit"+"taq" (jaq's own t/k/q-context literal) would double the
! "t" ("tittaq"), but gold wants "titaq". Not guessing a general "tt->t"
! degemination rule from this alone (Inuktitut geminate consonants are
! often phonemically real, so a blanket rule risks breaking legitimate
! ones elsewhere) -- instead "ti" is wired as its own literal candidate
! specifically on the path toward VnSuffixes (where jaq lives), same
! "different literal spellings for different following contexts" pattern
! as ut/usiq/liuq's own multi-candidate treatment above.
++tit+1vv:ti VerbContinuations ;

! Third literal, "tis" (own trailing t -> s), specifically on the path
! toward "sima"/1vv: "tukisinaliqtissimajuq" needs "tit"+"sima" to
! surface as "tissima" (own t assimilates toward the following s-initial
! suffix), same "different literal spellings for different following
! contexts" pattern as "ti" above -- not generalized into a blanket
! t->s rule from a single word, same caution already applied to "ti"'s
! own tt->t case.
++tit+1vv:tis VerbContinuations ;

! "iqqaqtuivilirijikkut"/"iqqaqtuivilirijikkunnut" need tuq/1vv's own
! trailing q dropped before the antipassive marker "i"/1vv attaches --
! Suffixes.csv's own "antipassive" column on tuq/1vv's row literally
! names "i/1vv" as its antipassive-marking partner suffix (and i/1vv's
! own condPrec, "antipassive:i/1vv", references it right back), a
! genuine confirmed row-level linkage, not a guess -- confirmed via the
! real Java analyzer's own output before wiring both entries.
++tuq+1vv:tu VerbContinuations ;

! "uuktuutigilugu" (root "uuk", k-final) needs "tu" with its own k
! preserved, NOT assimilated to "uuttu" -- same KGUARD trick as
! juq/1vn's own "KGUARDtu" elsewhere in this file. Not decomposable by
! the real Java analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).

! "aviktursimajuni" (root "avik", k-final) needs the own-q->r "tur"
! spelling (free variant, not in any CSV context column, same shape as
! naq/1vv's own "nar") WITH KGUARD too -- this is the same word that
! looked blocked earlier this session before KGUARD existed; revisiting
! now that the mechanism is proven. Not decomposable by the real Java
! analyzer either (confirmed via --pipeline).
++tuq+1vv:KGUARDtur VerbContinuations ;

! Endings_verb.csv has ~72 "tv,imp" (imperative mood) rows (9
! intransitive "nsp" person/number combinations, plus 63 transitive "sp"
! subject+object combinations) -- initially looked like a large, mostly
! Voicing/Fusion-shaped family worth its own pass, same lever as "lu"/1q.
! But a full sweep of the 985-word gold standard found only TWO words
! anywhere using ANY imperative ending: "tunngasugit" (git/tv-imp-2s) and
! "tunngasugitsi" (gipsi/tv-imp-2p) -- Hansard parliamentary transcripts
! essentially never contain direct commands, so this family's CSV row
! count wildly overstates its real marginal value in THIS corpus
! (contrast the dat/abl/loc/acc noun endings, each independently backed
! by many gold words). Implemented only what's cleanly gold-attested: "suk"/1vv (root
! "tunnga", V-context Neutral, its t/k-context Suppression is unrelated
! to and unaffected by the PMARK-scope issue that blocks
! "quviasukpunga" -- that collision is specifically about suk's own k
! assimilating incorrectly before a PMARK-derived p, which never arises
! here) and "git"/tv-imp-2s (k-context, Fusion == SUPPR reused, deletes
! suk's own trailing k, see TvEndings below): "tunngasu"+"git" =
! "tunngasugit". "gipsi"/tv-imp-2p is NOT implemented: its CSV k-form is
! literally "gipsi" (Fusion, single candidate), but the gold surface for
! "tunngasugitsi" is "...gitsi", not "...gipsi" -- a p->t-before-s
! alternation this row doesn't explain and no other CSV evidence
! confirms, so implementing it would mean guessing a new rule from one
! word, against this project's standing policy. The other 7 clean
! intransitive rows (langa/1s, li/3s, luk/1d, lik/3d, lit/3p -- all
! single-candidate V and t/k/q-Voicing, mechanically identical to
! "lu"/1q) and the entire 63-row transitive/object-agreement family are
! NOT implemented either: zero gold attestation for any of them in this
! corpus, and building them without a single real word to verify against
! would break from this project's standing "verify against a real gold
! example" discipline -- flagged as a scope/value question rather than
! silently either skipping the whole mood or guessing the rest.
! suk/1vv: the unconditioned hand-wiring these two lines used to
! describe ("quviasukpunga", root "quviak") is GONE -- "quviak" is
! among the roots whose CSV intransSuffix column lists "suk/1vv" (along
! with "gusuk/1vv"), so generate_affixes.py's own AfterIntransSukRoot
! trigger already covers both the V-context and the k-context
! Suppression candidate this word needs, without granting suk/1vv to
! every other verb stem too -- confirmed via snapshot_correct.py before
! removing this duplicate.
